Utah statutes.
58-60-111.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.
An individual who commits any act of unlawful conduct as defined in:
(1)  Subsection 58-60-109(1) or (2) is guilty of a third degree felony; or
(2)  Subsection 58-60-109(3) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
